Louisiana, session 2026, HB210.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 42:1111(C)(7) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1111. Payment from nonpublic sources
* * *
C. Payments for nonpublic service.
* * *
(7) A statewide elected official shall not be compensated for lobbying,
consulting, or advising.
* * *
Section 2. The provisions of R.S. 42:1111(C)(6) as enacted by Act No. 492 of the
2024 Regular Session of the Legislature shall be applied prospectively and retroactively.
However, the provisions of R.S. 42:1111(C)(6) as enacted by Act No. 492 of the 2024
Regular Session of the Legislature shall not apply to any matter subject to a final decision
of the Board of Ethics or Ethics Adjudicatory Board rendered on or before the effective date
of this Act. Any member of a school board or parish or municipal governing authority who
prior to June 5, 2024, was employed with a person that had or was seeking a contractual or
other business or financial relationship with the member's governmental entity or an agency
under the jurisdiction or supervision of the member's governmental entity shall not be
required to comply with the disclosure requirements in R.S. 42:1114 for such employment.
Page 1 of 2

HB NO. 210 ENROLLED
However, a person shall be required to file a disclosure for any employment on or after June
5, 2024, as required by R.S. 42:1111(C)(6).
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2